Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-1408
Availability of shared savings incentive payment program.

An insurance carrier shall make the shared savings incentive payment program available as a component of all health plans offered by the insurance carrier in this state. Annually at enrollment or renewal, an insurance carrier shall provide notice about the availability of the program to any enrollee who is enrolled in a health plan eligible for the program.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 18.